Hawaii statutes.
§302A-706 Teacher national board
certification incentive program. (a) There is established within the
department the teacher national board certification incentive program to
recognize and support exemplary teaching practice by supporting public school
teachers who have achieved national board certification under the certification
program of the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards. The teacher
national board certification incentive program shall provide:

(1) A $5,000 bonus per year for each public school
teacher who maintains current national board certification;

(2) $1,500 upon completing all components of the
certification program of the National Board for Professional Teaching
Standards;

(3) A reimbursement of the remainder of the national
board certification application fee upon achievement of national board
certification; and

(4) An additional $5,000 bonus per year for each
public school teacher who maintains current national board certification and
who teaches at:

(A) A school in a focus, priority, or
superintendent's zone, or other similar designation, as determined by the
department;

(B) A school with a high turnover rate, as
determined by the department; or

(C) A hard-to-fill school, as determined by
the department.

(b) The incentive program shall include a
mentoring component that encourages and enables national board-certified
teachers to assist other teachers and share their teaching expertise. [L 2004,
c 51, §38; am L 2007, c 228, §1; am L 2015, c 107, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next